zza/zza-Latn.aff
SFX M Y 118
SFX M 0 ê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 î [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 an [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 anê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 o [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 anî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êk [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ûn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 dê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êko [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêko [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ûnî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êkê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 a [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 andê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êde [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 e [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êkî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 în [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 enê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 in [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 on [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ondê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 onê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êdê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êndê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 û [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ode [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êno [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ek [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yo [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêk [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêkê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêde [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêndê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yode [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêkî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yanê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yan [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 yêno [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 îye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 i [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 atî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 înî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 wer [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êdo [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 îya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 were [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ekî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ko [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êkew [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 anên [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ayî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ayîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ayîye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 eko [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 eyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ane [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ano [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 atîye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ayê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 do [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 eka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ekê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 indo [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 iyenê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 kiştişî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 êndo [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 îyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 îyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ûney [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ûnê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX M e ê e$ 
SFX M e î e$ 
SFX M e i e$ 
SFX M e în e$ 
SFX M e im e$ 
SFX M e an e$ 
SFX M e in e$
SFX M e ûn e$
SFX M e înî e$ 
SFX M e imî e$ 
SFX M e imo e$ 
SFX M e imê e$ 
SFX M e inî e$ 
SFX M e anê e$ 
SFX M e îdê e$ 
SFX M e îna e$ 
SFX M e îno e$ 
SFX M e înê e$ 
SFX M e îye e$ 
SFX M e îyê e$ 
SFX M e iman e$ 
SFX M e imey e$ 
SFX M e imdê e$ 
SFX M e imon e$ 
SFX M e iwan e$ 
SFX M e imanê e$ 
SFX M e imêko e$ 
SFX M e imonê e$ 
SFX M e imêdo e$ 
SFX M e imondê e$ 
SFX M 0 k [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 y [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 kî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 kê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 dê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 ko [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 hî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 tî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 kan [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 kêk [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 kêde [aeêiîouû] .
SFX M 0 tîya [aeêiîouû] .



############### ADJECTIVES ###############

SFX A Y 59
SFX A 0 a [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 alu [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 alun [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 aluna [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 an [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 anê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ay [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 e [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ek [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 eka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 eke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekiya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 eko [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekênî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekênîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekêr [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekêre [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekîye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ekîyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 er [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ey [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 eya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 i [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ik [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ika [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ikan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ikî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 iye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 iyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 kek [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 kekî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 kêney [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 o [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 on [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 oyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 tirîn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 êk [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 êka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 êke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ênîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 êr [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 êrî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 êya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 î [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îbî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îkîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îyade [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îyo [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 îyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 û [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ûn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX A 0 ûnî [^aeêiîouû] .


############### Verbs ##########################################################

PFX V Y 79
PFX V 0 bi . 
PFX V 0 nê . 
PFX V 0 me .
PFX V 0 anê .
PFX V 0 danê .
PFX V 0 denê .
PFX V 0 panê .
PFX V 0 ponê .
PFX V 0 ranê .
PFX V 0 ronê .
PFX V 0 tanê .
PFX V 0 tonê .
PFX V 0 wenê .
PFX V 0 pênê .
PFX V 0 nêa .
PFX V 0 nêda .
PFX V 0 nêde .
PFX V 0 nêpa .
PFX V 0 nêpo .
PFX V 0 nêra .
PFX V 0 nêro .
PFX V 0 nêta .
PFX V 0 nêto .
PFX V 0 nêwe .
PFX V 0 nêpê .
PFX V 0 a .
PFX V 0 da .
PFX V 0 de .
PFX V 0 pa .
PFX V 0 po .
PFX V 0 ra .
PFX V 0 ro .
PFX V 0 ta .
PFX V 0 to .
PFX V 0 we .
PFX V 0 mea .
PFX V 0 meda .
PFX V 0 mede .
PFX V 0 mepa .
PFX V 0 mepo .
PFX V 0 mera .
PFX V 0 mero .
PFX V 0 meta .
PFX V 0 meto .
PFX V 0 mewe .
PFX V 0 mepê .
PFX V 0 ame .
PFX V 0 dame .
PFX V 0 deme .
PFX V 0 pame .
PFX V 0 pome .
PFX V 0 rame .
PFX V 0 rome .
PFX V 0 tame .
PFX V 0 tome .
PFX V 0 weme .
PFX V 0 pême .
PFX V 0 bia .
PFX V 0 bida .
PFX V 0 bide .
PFX V 0 bipa .
PFX V 0 bipo .
PFX V 0 bira .
PFX V 0 biro .
PFX V 0 bita .
PFX V 0 bito .
PFX V 0 biwe .
PFX V 0 bipê .
PFX V 0 abi .
PFX V 0 dabi .
PFX V 0 debi .
PFX V 0 pabi .
PFX V 0 pobi .
PFX V 0 rabi .
PFX V 0 robi .
PFX V 0 tabi .
PFX V 0 tobi .
PFX V 0 webi .
PFX V 0 pêbi . 

SFX V Y 50
SFX V e ê e
SFX V e ina e
SFX V e ino e
SFX V e inê e
SFX V e inî e
SFX V e îme e
SFX V e îye e
SFX V e îyê e
SFX V e î e
SFX V e a e
SFX V e o e
SFX V 0 nû .
SFX V 0 na .
SFX V 0 nî .
SFX V 0 no .
SFX V 0 nê .
SFX V 0 n e$
SFX V 0 no e$
SFX V 0 na e$
SFX V 0 nê e$
SFX V 0 nî e$
SFX V 0 nû e$
SFX V 0 nd e$
SFX V 0 ne e$
SFX V 0 ni e$
SFX V 0 nan e$
SFX V 0 nûn e$
SFX V 0 nîy e$
SFX V 0 nim e$
SFX V 0 ney e$
SFX V 0 nîm e$
SFX V 0 nîme e$
SFX V 0 nane e$
SFX V 0 nena e$
SFX V 0 nîmê e$
SFX V 0 nûne e$
SFX V 0 nîmi e$
SFX V 0 nimi e$
SFX V e iro e$
SFX V e ira e$
SFX V e irî  e$
SFX V e irê e$
SFX V e irên e$
SFX V e irîn e$
SFX V 0 ro .
SFX V 0 ra .
SFX V 0 rî .
SFX V 0 rê .
SFX V 0 rên .
SFX V 0 rîn .


PFX I Y 79
PFX I 0 nê .
PFX I 0 bi .
PFX I 0 me .
PFX I 0 anê .
PFX I 0 danê .
PFX I 0 denê .
PFX I 0 panê .
PFX I 0 ponê .
PFX I 0 ranê .
PFX I 0 ronê .
PFX I 0 tanê .
PFX I 0 tonê .
PFX I 0 wenê .
PFX I 0 pênê .
PFX I 0 nêa .
PFX I 0 nêda .
PFX I 0 nêde .
PFX I 0 nêpa .
PFX I 0 nêpo .
PFX I 0 nêra .
PFX I 0 nêro .
PFX I 0 nêta .
PFX I 0 nêto .
PFX I 0 nêwe .
PFX I 0 nêpê .
PFX I 0 a .
PFX I 0 da .
PFX I 0 de .
PFX I 0 pa .
PFX I 0 po .
PFX I 0 ra .
PFX I 0 ro .
PFX I 0 ta .
PFX I 0 to .
PFX I 0 we .
PFX I 0 mea .
PFX I 0 meda .
PFX I 0 mede .
PFX I 0 mepa .
PFX I 0 mepo .
PFX I 0 mera .
PFX I 0 mero .
PFX I 0 meta .
PFX I 0 meto .
PFX I 0 mewe .
PFX I 0 mepê .
PFX I 0 ame .
PFX I 0 dame .
PFX I 0 deme .
PFX I 0 pame .
PFX I 0 pome .
PFX I 0 rame .
PFX I 0 rome .
PFX I 0 tame .
PFX I 0 tome .
PFX I 0 weme .
PFX I 0 pême .
PFX I 0 bia .
PFX I 0 bida .
PFX I 0 bide .
PFX I 0 bipa .
PFX I 0 bipo .
PFX I 0 bira .
PFX I 0 biro .
PFX I 0 bita .
PFX I 0 bito .
PFX I 0 biwe .
PFX I 0 bipê .
PFX I 0 abi .
PFX I 0 dabi .
PFX I 0 debi .
PFX I 0 pabi .
PFX I 0 pobi .
PFX I 0 rabi .
PFX I 0 robi .
PFX I 0 tabi .
PFX I 0 tobi .
PFX I 0 webi .
PFX I 0 pêbi .
