zza/zza-Latn.dic
album/M po:masculine
alozne/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:aloznayene
ame/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:ameyene
ardiş/XM po:verb is:infinitive2_transitive_active lem:ardene
bamye/M po:masculine
be/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:bîyayene
bedilîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:bedilîyayene
betilnayîş/M po:masculine
buros/M po:masculine
cawîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:cawîyayene
cemidîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:cemidîyayene
cenawer/M po:masculine
darîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:darîyayene
debîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:debîyayene
delal/A po:adjective
derdê-zerrî/M po:masculine
doşe/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:dotene
enim/M po:masculine
erjîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:erjîyayene
eynû/A po:adjective
ferqizîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:ferqizîyayene
gazincîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:gazincîyene
gijik/M po:masculine
girêde/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:girêdayene
guvîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:guvîyayene
herikîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:herikîyayene
hewilîyayîş/M po:masculine
hinglisîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:hinglisîyayene
ke/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:kerdene
kendiş/XM po:verb is:infinitive2_transitive_active lem:kendene
kixa/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:kixayene
lane/M po:masculine
lebe/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:lebayene
lewîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:lewîyayene
meyene/M po:masculine
miloqîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:miloqîyayene
mumkun/A po:adjective
musa/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:musayine
nefirne/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:nefirnayene
nexişkerde/M po:masculine
pajîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:pajîyayene
pelixîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:pelixîyayene
pergendebîyayîş/M po:masculine
piroşane/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:piroşanayene
pêhesîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:pêhesîyayene
pîzeşîyayîş/M po:masculine
qelişne/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:qelişnayene
qerqişîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:qerqişîyayene
quledekerdiş/M po:masculine
qîjîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:qîjîyayene
qîra/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:qîrayene
rema/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:remayene
reqisîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:reqisîyayene
rîyejkerdiş/M po:masculine
rûçikne/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:rûçiknayene
sahna/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:sahnayene
sur/A po:adjective
surbîyaye/M po:masculine
tepîşe/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:tepîştene
tewrkerde/M po:masculine
têvda/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:têvdayene
têwgêra/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:têwgêrayene
verê-teştareyî/M po:masculine
vilêşîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:vilêşîyayene
vurine/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:vurinayene
wedarîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:wedarîyayene
weşiarêdayîş/M po:masculine
wurîya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:wurîyayene
xebitîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:xebitîyayene
xura/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:xurayene
yelxe/M po:masculine
çepkî/M po:masculine
çera/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:çerayene
çermiqîye/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active lem:çermiqîyayene
şatik/M po:masculine
şena/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active lem:şenayene
şû/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active lem:şûtene
armenîstanij/A po:adjectives
bangkokij/A po:adjectives
bexdadij/A po:adjectives
brazzavîllij/A po:adjectives
çemişgezekij/A po:adjectives
efxanîstanij/A po:adjectives
etyopyayij/A po:adjectives
gimgimij/A po:adjectives
hindîstanij/A po:adjectives
îstembulij/A po:adjectives
kemalîyeyij/A po:adjectives
kurdîstanij/A po:adjectives
lubnanij/A po:adjectives
marokij/A po:adjectives
motkanij/A po:adjectives
nuukij/A po:adjectives
pîranij/A po:adjectives
rabatij/A po:adjectives
spanyayij/A po:adjectives
urdunij/A po:adjectives
zaîreyij/A po:adjectives
